Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.150

City manager—Substitute.

The council may designate a qualified administrative officer of the city or town to perform the duties of manager:

(1) Upon the adoption of the council-manager plan, pending the selection and appointment of a manager; or

(2) Upon the termination of the services of a manager, pending the selection and appointment of a new manager; or

(3) During the absence, disability, or suspension of the manager.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.150.]